District of Columbia statutes.
2-354.14

Cancellation of solicitations.

An Invitation for Bid, a Request for Proposals, or other solicitation may be cancelled if it is determined in writing by the CPO that the action is taken in the best interests of the District government.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 414, 58 DCR 1185